Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-807
Public agencies; contracts authorized; contents.

Any one or more public agencies may contract with any one or more other public agencies to perform any governmental service, activity, or undertaking which at least one of the public agencies entering into the contract is authorized by law to perform. Such contract shall be authorized by the governing body of each party to the contract. Such contract shall set forth fully as provided in the Interlocal Cooperation Act the purposes, powers, rights, objectives, and responsibilities of the contracting parties.

Laws 1963, c. 333, § 7, p. 1074;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2207;

Laws 1991, LB 731, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 269, § 13.